Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 17.3 Ballast Water

46-17.3-1.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds that:

The waters of the state are a precious, irreplaceable resource essential to the environment, commerce, and recreation of citizens and tourists of the state;

Non-indigenous aquatic species introduced into waters of the United States from ballast water have caused tremendous environmental and ecological damage, displacing native species, degrading water quality, and interfering with commerce, including the zebra mussel brought into the Great Lakes and the upper Susquehanna River;

Ballast water practices of commercial shipping vessels may cause irreversible damage to waters of the state; and

Protective measures against the introduction of non-indigenous aquatic species from ballast water are necessary to minimize exposure of the waters of the state to unwanted contamination and damage caused by these species.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 173, § 1.

46-17.3-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to commence the process of developing a ballast water management program in Rhode Island by:

Calling upon the department of environmental management to investigate and evaluate all relevant state, federal and international laws and policies relating to invasive species management generally and ballast water management specifically; and

Directing the department of environmental management to report to the general assembly no later than January 15, 2002, regarding the results of the investigation, along with recommended options for establishing a ballast water management program in Rhode Island.

In carrying out the purposes of this chapter, the department of environmental management shall coordinate with all relevant agencies and organizations, including but not limited to: the International Maritime Organization, the U.S. Coast Guard, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, the National Oceanographic and Atmosphere Administration, the U.S. Department of Interior, the Rhode Island coastal resources management council, the Rhode Island economic development corporation, the University of Rhode Island, commercial shipping interests and environmental organizations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 173, § 1.